Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-908
Child reaching age of majority; disposition of assets.

An attempt shall be made by the Department of Health and Human Services to locate children who arrive at the age of majority for the purpose of delivering and transferring to any such child such funds or property as he or she may own. In the event that such child cannot be located within five years after the child arrives at the age of majority, any funds or assets owned by him or her shall be transferred to the state treasury of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1963, c. 245, § 2, p. 740;

Laws 1977, LB 312, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 188;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 126.